Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1116.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 29, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2903.18, to read: START_STATUTE36-2903.18. Behavioral health claims; American Indian health program; appeal review requirement Before Any CLAIM DENIAL OR ADVERSE appeal DETERMINATION BASED ON THE MEDICAL NECESSITY of a behavioral health SERVICE COVERED BY THE american Indian health program, THE CLAIM AND SUPPORTING MEDICAL RECORD DOCUMENTATION shall be reviewed AND THE DENIAL OR ADVERSE DETERMINATION APPROVED by an individual who has AT LEAST TWO YEARS OF relevant clinical experience PROVIDING THE SAME OR SIMILAR SERVICES TO THE SERVICES AT ISSUE. END_STATUTE